Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-1712
Tenant of business incubation center; benefits; services.

(1) In return for meeting the requirements of section 72-1711, a tenant shall receive the following benefits:

(a) Physical space within the center;

(b) The services of a building manager; and

(c) Services or facilities available within the center that are agreed upon by the community board and the tenants. These services and facilities may include, but are not limited to, cleaning, building security, typing, and reception services, conference, laboratory, and library facilities, duplicating machines, and computers.

(2) In addition to the benefits described in subsection (1) of this section, the center may make available certain professional services on a fee-for-use basis. These services, which the building manager or community board shall arrange, may include, but are not limited to, information on government regulations, basic management skills, advertising and promotion, marketing, sales, control of inventory levels, recruitment of employees, labor relations, and financial counseling in areas such as venture capital, risk management, taxes, insurance, and qualifying for government small business loans.

Laws 1990, LB 409, § 12.